Washington statutes.
RCW 9.51.020

Soliciting jury duty.

Every person who shall, directly or indirectly, solicit or request any person charged with the duty of preparing any jury list to put his or her name, or the name of any other person, on any such list, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 308; 1909 c 249 s 76; 1888 p 114 s 1; RRS s 2328.]